Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-527
Petition; dismissal; appeal and writ of error denied.

If the Chief Water Officer finds that no petition has been signed and presented in conformity with the Reclamation Act, or that the material facts are not as set forth in the petition filed, the Chief Water Officer shall dismiss the proceedings and adjudge the costs against the signers of the petition in such proportion as the Chief Water Officer shall deem just and equitable. No appeal or writ of error shall lie from an order dismissing the proceeding. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent the filing of a subsequent petition or petitions for similar improvements or for a similar reclamation district, and the right to so renew such proceeding is hereby expressly granted and authorized.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 7(9), p. 531;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 162.